Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.514

Child care facility fund committee—Grants, repayment requirements.

Where the child care facility fund committee makes a grant to a person, organization, or business, the grant shall be repaid to the child care facility fund if the child care facility using the grant to start or expand ceases to provide child care earlier than the following time periods from the date the grant is made: (1) Twelve months for a grant up to five thousand dollars; (2) twenty-four months for a grant over five thousand dollars up to ten thousand dollars; (3) thirty-six months for a grant over ten thousand dollars up to fifteen thousand dollars; (4) forty-eight months for a grant over fifteen thousand dollars up to twenty thousand dollars; and (5) sixty months for a grant over twenty thousand dollars up to twenty-five thousand dollars.

[ 1989 c 430 s 8.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—1989 c 430: See notes following RCW 43.31.502.